apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="g/oen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aange</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ees</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éings</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éingt</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungs</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungt</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éi</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="k/ommen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>omme</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omm</l>       <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>omme</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënns</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënnt</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omme</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommt</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omme</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éim</l>       <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éims</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éim</l>       <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éime</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éimt</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éime</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oum</l>       <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oums</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oum</l>       <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oume</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oumt</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oume</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>omm</l>       <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommt</l>      <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/aachen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aache</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- pp requires individual entry -->

  <e>       <p><l>aache</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>échs</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>écht</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aache</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aacht</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aache</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éich</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éichs</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éich</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiche</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éicht</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiche</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ouch</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouchs</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouch</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouche</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oucht</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouche</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aach</l>      <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aacht</l>     <r>aachen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abiméier/en__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abuséieren">      <i>abuséier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acceptéieren">    <i>acceptéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="accuséieren">     <i>accuséier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="adoptéieren">     <i>adoptéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agresséieren">    <i>agresséier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alarméieren">     <i>alarméier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="approuvéieren">   <i>approuvéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bedéngen">        <i>bedéng</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begeeschteren">   <i>begeeschter</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="behënneren">      <i>behënner</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bekucken">        <i>bekuck</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beleidegen">      <i>beleideg</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bemusteren">      <i>bemuster</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beonrouegen">     <i>beonroueg</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="besabbelen">      <i>besabbel</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beschäftegen">    <i>beschäfteg</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betounen">        <i>betoun</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bezeemen">        <i>bezeem</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bricoléieren">    <i>bricoléier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cernéieren">      <i>cernéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="coifféieren">     <i>coifféier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="consignéieren">   <i>consignéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deblockéieren">   <i>deblockéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="defloréieren">    <i>defloréier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deklinéieren">    <i>deklinéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demarkéieren">    <i>demarkéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demontéieren">    <i>demontéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deponéieren">     <i>deponéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desensibiliséieren"><i>desensibiliséier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deviéieren">      <i>deviéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diskreditéieren"> <i>diskreditéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dividéieren">     <i>dividéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dramatiséieren">  <i>dramatiséier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="elektrifizéieren"><i>elektrifizéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entbieren">       <i>entbier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entschiedegen">   <i>entschiedeg</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entwässeren">     <i>entwässer</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erfuerschen">     <i>erfuersch</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ermonteren">      <i>ermonter</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erreechen">       <i>erreech</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eskortéieren">    <i>eskortéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exageréieren">    <i>exageréier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exkommunizéieren"><i>exkommunizéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exportéieren">    <i>exportéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="faszinéieren">    <i>faszinéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="formatéieren">    <i>formatéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="garantéieren">    <i>garantéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="goen">            <i>g</i><par n="g/oen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gouvernéieren">   <i>gouvernéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="homologéieren">   <i>homologéier</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iwwerliwweren">   <i>iwwerliwwer</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kommen">          <i>k</i><par n="k/ommen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maachen">         <i>m</i><par n="m/aachen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verdéngen">       <i>verdéng</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ënnerhillegen">   <i>ënnerhilleg</i><par n="abiméier/en__vblex"/></e>
